Vermont statutes. Title 11A Vermont Business Corporations
Subchapter 1. Records

§ 16.01.
Corporate powers.

A corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its shareholders and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, and records of all actions taken by a committee of the board of directors in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation.

A corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

A corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its shareholders, in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names and addresses of all shareholders, in alphabetical order by class of shares showing the number and class of shares held by each.

A corporation shall maintain its records in written form or in another form, including electronic form, capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

A corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office (or, if none in this State, then the registered office):

its articles or restated articles of incorporation and all amendments to them currently in effect;

its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

resolutions adopted by its board of directors creating one or more classes or series of shares, and fixing their relative rights, preferences, and limitations, if shares issued pursuant to those resolutions are outstanding;

the minutes of all shareholders’ meetings, and records of all action taken by shareholders without a meeting;

all written or electronic communications to shareholders generally within the past three years, including the financial statements furnished for the past three years under section 16.20 of this title;

a list of the names and business addresses of its current directors and officers; and

its most recent annual report delivered to the Secretary of State under section 16.22 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 100, eff. June 6, 2008.

§ 16.02.
Inspection of records by shareholders.

A shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the corporation’s principal office, or, if none in this State, the registered office, any of the records of the corporation described in subsection 16.01(e) of this title if the shareholder gives the corporation written notice of the shareholder’s demand at least five business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy. A shareholder of a close corporation as defined in section 20.02 of this title is also entitled to inspect and copy, pursuant to this subsection, such corporation’s record of shareholders.

A shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the shareholder meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and gives the corporation written notice of his or her demand at least five business days before the day on which he or she wishes to inspect and copy:

accounting records of the corporation; and

the record of shareholders.

A shareholder may inspect and copy the records described in subsection (b) of this section only if:

the shareholder establishes that the shareholder’s demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

the shareholder describes with reasonable particularity the shareholder’s purpose and the records the shareholder desires to inspect; and

the records are directly connected with the shareholder’s purpose.

The right of inspection granted by this section may not be abolished or limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.

This section does not affect:

the right of a shareholder to inspect records under section 7.20 of this title or, if the shareholder is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant;

the power of a court, independently of this title, to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

For purposes of this section, “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on his or her behalf.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 16.03.
Scope of inspection right.

A shareholder’s agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the shareholder he or she represents.

The right to copy records under section 16.02 of this title includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photocopy, or other means.

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the shareholder. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.

The corporation may comply with a shareholder’s demand to inspect the record of shareholders under subsection 16.02(a) and subdivision 16.02(b)(2) of this title by providing the shareholder with a list of its shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of the shareholder’s demand.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 16.04.
Court-ordered inspection.

If a corporation does not allow a shareholder who complies with subsection 16.02(a) of this title to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the Superior Court of the county where the corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this State, then the registered office) is located may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation’s expense upon application of the shareholder.

If the corporation does not within a reasonable time allow shareholders to inspect and copy any other record, the shareholder who complies with subsections 16.02(b) and (c) of this title may apply to the Superior Court of the county where the corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this State, then the registered office) is located for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the shareholder’s costs (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred to obtain the order unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder to inspect the records demanded.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use and distribution of the records by the demanding shareholder.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.